Utah statutes.
32B-2-403.   Alcoholic Beverage Enforcement and Treatment Restricted Account created.

(1) (a)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Alcoholic Beverage Enforcement and Treatment Restricted Account."

(b)  The account is funded from:

(i)  money deposited by the state treasurer in accordance with Section 59-15-109;

(ii)  appropriations made to the account by the Legislature; and

(iii)  interest described in Subsection (1)(c).

(c)  Interest earned on the account shall be deposited into the account.

(2) (a)  Consistent with the policies provided in Subsection 32B-1-103(4)(b), money in the account shall be used for statewide public purposes, including promoting the reduction of the harmful effects of over consumption of alcoholic products by an adult and alcohol consumption by minors, by exclusively funding programs or projects related to prevention, treatment, detection, prosecution, and control of violations of this title and other offenses in which alcohol is a contributing factor except as provided in Subsection (2)(b).

(b)  The portion distributed under this part to a county may also be used for the confinement or treatment of persons arrested for or convicted of offenses in which alcohol is a contributing factor.

(c)  A municipality or county entitled to receive money shall use the money exclusively as required by this Subsection (2).

(3)  The appropriations provided for under Section 32B-2-404 are:

(a)  intended to supplement the budget of the appropriate agencies of each municipality and county within the state to enable the municipalities and counties to more effectively fund the programs and projects described in Subsection (2); and

(b)  not intended to replace money that would otherwise be allocated for the programs and projects in Subsection (2).



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

